Hawaii, session 2025, GM1326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION I. The legislature finds that existing
2 administrative rules allow an individual wastewater system to
3 serve no more than five bedrooms, whether the five bedrooms are
4 in one dwelling unit or two dwelling units. However, the
5 definition of a dwelling unit under chapter 62, Hawaii
6 Administrative Rules, does not clearly consider the varied types
7 of development, such as dwelling units that may have exterior
8 bedrooms without a kitchen or guest houses with a bathroom but
9 without a kitchen. Certain dwelling units may be prohibited
JO from using an individual wastewater system solely because the
11 bedrooms are outside the dwelling unit.
12 Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to allow an
13 individual wastewater system to serve up to five bedrooms,
14 regardless of the number of dwellings, dwelling units, or
15 accessory units, whether the dwellings, dwelling units, or
16 accessory units are attached or detached, with certain
17 exclusions.
2025-3250 HB735 CDl HMSO
iiiiiniiiiiiniiniBiHnii

Page 2 H.B. NO.
h“2
C.D. 1
1 SECTION 2. Chapter 342D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
2 amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
3 and to read as follows:
4 "§342D- Individual wastewater system; dwelling units.
5 An individual wastewater system may serve up to five bedrooms,
6 regardless of the number of:
7 (1) Dwellings or dwelling units; or
8 (2) Accessory units as defined by the counties,
9 whether the dwellings, dwelling units, or accessory units are
10 attached or detached; provided that this section shall not apply
11 to any new requests to connect additional dwelling units to an
12 existing cesspool."
13 SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
14 SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3250 HB735 CDl HMSO
niiinwHiiiioiiiiHiiii

H.B. NO. S?
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 25th day of June , 2025

HB No. 735, HD 2, SD1,CD1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 735, H.D. 2, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai'i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
224